Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201960-482
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 1977, LB 90, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 100;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-406.06;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 32;

Laws 1994, LB 1061, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 32.
September 1, 2019